District of Columbia statutes.
31-1904

Revocation of Certificate of Authority.

The Mayor may fine insurance companies or suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the Certificate of Authority of any insurer failing to file its annual statement when due or within any extension of time which the Mayor, for good cause, may have granted.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-42, § 5, 40 DCR 6020

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-3404.